Nevada, session 83, AB408.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 209 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. The Department, in consultation with the
Department of Public Safety, the State Board of Pardons
Commissioners and the State Board of Parole Commissioners,
shall establish and maintain an automated victim notification
system to notify victims of crime by telephone or electronic means
of:
(a) The release of the offender into the community;
(b) The escape of the offender from the custody of the
Department;
(c) The request of an offender to serve a term of residential
confinement pursuant to NRS 209.392;
(d) The intent of the Director to assign an offender to the
custody of the Division of Parole and Probation of the Department
of Public Safety to serve a term of residential confinement or other
appropriate supervision determined by the Division of Parole and
Probation pursuant to NRS 209.3923 or 209.3925;
(e) The intent to assign, or the approval of the assignment of,
an offender to the custody of the Division of Parole and Probation
of the Department of Public Safety to serve a term of residential
confinement pursuant to NRS 209.429;
(f) The date of a meeting of the State Board of Pardons
Commissioners to consider an application for clemency pursuant
to NRS 213.010;
(g) The date of a meeting of the State Board of Parole
Commissioners to consider a prisoner for parole pursuant to NRS
213.131; and
(h) The parole of a prisoner by the State Board of Parole
Commissioners pursuant to NRS 213.131.
2. A notice pursuant to paragraphs (c), (d) and (e) of
subsection 1 must advise the victim that the victim may submit
documents for consideration in the noticed matter.
3. A notice pursuant to paragraph (f) of subsection 1 must:
(a) Be given not later than 15 days before the meeting; and
(b) Advise the victim that the victim may submit a written
response for consideration at the meeting.
4. A notice pursuant to paragraph (g) of subsection 1 must:
(a) Be given not later than 5 days after the date on which the
State Board of Parole Commissioners fixes the date for the
meeting; and
-
*AB408*

– 4 –
(b) Advise the victim that the victim may submit documents
and testify at the meeting.
5. A prosecuting attorney shall:
(a) Provide information concerning the automated victim
notification system to each victim; and
(b) Register each victim that requests inclusion in the
automated victim notification system.
6. The automated victim notification system must authorize a
victim to update any contact information included in the
automated victim notification system.
7. The failure of the automated victim notification system to
notify a victim of a change in the custody status of an offender
described in subsection 1 does not establish a basis for any cause
of action by the victim or any other party against the State, its
political subdivisions, or the agencies, boards, commissions,
departments, officers or employees of the State or its political
subdivisions.
8. The contact information of a victim and any document or
written response provided by a victim as described in this section is
confidential.
Sec. 3. 1. The Department may enter into an agreement
with a person to manage the automated victim notification system
established by section 2 of this act.
2. The selection of a person described in subsection 1 must be
made every 5 years through an open competitive bidding process.
3. An agreement entered into pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Require the person to provide quarterly reports to the
Governor which:
(1) Identify any third party who has been given access to
information contained in the automated victim notification system
during the previous quarter;
(2) Provide the number of notification errors that resulted
during the previous quarter from the automated victim notification
system; and
(3) Detail how any funds received from the Federal
Government for the automated victim notification system have
been spent by the person, including, without limitation, if the
funds have been used to upgrade or provide improvements to the
automated victim notification system and whether the upgrades
and improvements have reduced the number of notification errors
or otherwise resulted in quantifiable improvements in the
accuracy or reliability of the automated victim notification system;
(b) Except for the purpose of notifying a victim pursuant to
section 2 of this act, prohibit the person from selling or sharing
the information contained in the automated victim notification
-
*AB408*

– 5 –
system without first obtaining the written consent of the
Department; and
(c) If the selling or sharing of information contained in the
automated victim notification system is authorized pursuant to
paragraph (b), require the person to comply with all applicable
laws concerning the sharing or selling of the data.
4. The Department shall notify any governmental entity that
submits information to the automated victim notification system
before modifying or terminating an agreement entered into
pursuant to subsection 1.
Sec. 4. NRS 209.392 is hereby amended to read as follows:
209.392 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 209.3923,
209.3925 and 209.429, the Director may, at the request of an
offender who is eligible for residential confinement pursuant to the
standards adopted by the Director pursuant to subsection 3 and who
has:
(a) Demonstrated a willingness and ability to establish a position
of employment in the community;
(b) Demonstrated a willingness and ability to enroll in a
program for education or rehabilitation; or
(c) Demonstrated an ability to pay for all or part of the costs of
the offender’s confinement and to meet any existing obligation for
restitution to any victim of his or her crime,
 assign the offender to the custody of the Division of Parole and
Probation of the Department of Public Safety to serve a term of
residential confinement, pursuant to NRS 213.380, for not longer
than the remainder of his or her sentence.
2. Upon receiving a request to serve a term of residential
confinement from an eligible offender, the Director shall notify the
Division of Parole and Probation. [Except as otherwise provided in
NRS 213.10915, if any victim of a crime committed by the offender
has, pursuant to subsection 4 of NRS 213.131, requested to be
notified of the consideration of a prisoner for parole and has
provided a current address, the Division of Parole and Probation
shall notify the victim of the offender’s request and advise the
victim that the victim may submit documents regarding the request
to the Division of Parole and Probation. If a current address has not
been provided as required by subsection 4 of NRS 213.131, the
Division of Parole and Probation must not be held responsible if
such notification is not received by the victim. All personal
information, including, but not limited to, a current or former
address, which pertains to a victim and which is received by the
Division of Parole and Probation pursuant to this subsection is
confidential.]
-
*AB408*

– 6 –
3. The Director, after consulting with the Division of Parole
and Probation, shall adopt, by regulation, standards providing which
offenders are eligible for residential confinement. The standards
adopted by the Director must provide that an offender who:
(a) Has recently committed a serious infraction of the rules of an
institution or facility of the Department;
(b) Has not performed the duties assigned to the offender in a
faithful and orderly manner;
(c) Has been convicted of:
(1) Any crime that is punishable as a felony involving the use
or threatened use of force or violence against the victim within the
immediately preceding 3 years;
(2) A sexual offense that is punishable as a felony; or
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, a category
A or B felony;
(d) Has more than one prior conviction for any felony in this
State or any offense in another state that would be a felony if
committed in this State, not including a violation of NRS 484C.110,
484C.120, 484C.130, 484C.430, 488.420, 488.425 or 488.427; or
(e) Has escaped or attempted to escape from any jail or
correctional institution for adults,
 is not eligible for assignment to the custody of the Division of
Parole and Probation to serve a term of residential confinement
pursuant to this section.
4. The standards adopted by the Director pursuant to
subsection 3 must provide that an offender who has been convicted
of a category B felony is eligible for assignment to the custody of
the Division of Parole and Probation to serve a term of residential
confinement pursuant to this section if:
(a) The offender is not otherwise ineligible pursuant to
subsection 3 for an assignment to serve a term of residential
confinement; and
(b) The Director makes a written finding that such an
assignment of the offender is not likely to pose a threat to the safety
of the public.
5. If an offender assigned to the custody of the Division of
Parole and Probation pursuant to this section escapes or violates any
of the terms or conditions of the offender’s residential confinement:
(a) The Division of Parole and Probation may, pursuant to the
procedure set forth in NRS 213.410, return the offender to the
custody of the Department.
(b) The offender forfeits all or part of the credits for good
behavior earned by the offender before the escape or violation, as
determined by the Director. The Director may provide for a
forfeiture of credits pursuant to this paragraph only after proof of the
-
*AB408*

– 7 –
offense and notice to the offender and may restore credits forfeited
for such reasons as the Director considers proper. The decision of
the Director regarding such a forfeiture is final.
6. The assignment of an offender to the custody of the Division
of Parole and Probation pursuant to this section shall be deemed:
(a) A continuation of the offender’s imprisonment and not a
release on parole; and
(b) For the purposes of NRS 209.341, an assignment to a facility
of the Department,
 except that the offender is not entitled to obtain any benefits or to
participate in any programs provided to offenders in the custody of
the Department.
7. An offender does not have a right to be assigned to the
custody of the Division of Parole and Probation pursuant to this
section, or to remain in that custody after such an assignment, and it
is not intended that the provisions of this section or of NRS 213.371
to 213.410, inclusive, create any right or interest in liberty or
property or establish a basis for any cause of action against the
State, its political subdivisions, agencies, boards, commissions,
departments, officers or employees.
8. The Division of Parole and Probation may receive and
distribute restitution paid by an offender assigned to the custody of
the Division of Parole and Probation pursuant to this section.
Sec. 5. NRS 209.3923 is hereby amended to read as follows:
209.3923 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [6,]
5, the Director may assign an offender to the custody of the Division
of Parole and Probation of the Department of Public Safety to serve
a term of residential confinement pursuant to NRS 213.380 or other
appropriate supervision as determined by the Division of Parole and
Probation, for not longer than the remainder of his or her sentence,
if the offender:
(a) Is 65 years of age or older;
(b) Has not been convicted of:
(1) A crime of violence;
(2) A crime against a child as defined in NRS 179D.0357;
(3) A sexual offense as defined in NRS 179D.097;
(4) Vehicular homicide pursuant to NRS 484C.130; or
(5) A violation of NRS 484C.430; and
(c) Has served at least a majority of the maximum term or
maximum aggregate term, as applicable, of his or her sentence.
2. If the Director intends to assign an offender to the custody of
the Division of Parole and Probation pursuant to this section, at least
45 days before the date the offender is expected to be released from
the custody of the Department, the Director shall notify:
-
*AB408*

– 8 –
(a) The board of county commissioners of the county in which
the offender will reside; and
(b) The Division of Parole and Probation.
3. [Except as otherwise provided in NRS 213.10915, if any
victim of a crime committed by the offender has, pursuant to
subsection 4 of NRS 213.131, requested to be notified of the
consideration of a prisoner for parole and has provided a current
address, the Division of Parole and Probation shall notify the victim
that:
(a) The Director intends to assign the offender to the custody of
the Division of Parole and Probation pursuant to this section; and
(b) The victim may submit documents to the Division of Parole
and Probation regarding such an assignment.
 If a current address has not been provided by a victim as required
by subsection 4 of NRS 213.131, the Division of Parole and
Probation must not be held responsible if notification is not received
by the victim. All personal information, including, without
limitation, a current or former address, which pertains to a victim
and which is received by the Division of Parole and Probation
pursuant to this subsection is confidential.
4.] If an offender assigned to the custody of the Division of
Parole and Probation pursuant to this section escapes or violates any
of the terms or conditions of his or her residential confinement or
other appropriate supervision as determined by the Division of
Parole and Probation:
(a) The Division of Parole and Probation may, pursuant to the
procedure set forth in NRS 213.410, return the offender to the
custody of the Department.
(b) The offender forfeits all or part of the credits for good
behavior earned by the offender before the escape or violation, as
determined by the Director. The Director may provide for a
forfeiture of credits pursuant to this paragraph only after proof of the
offense and notice to the offender and may restore credits forfeited
for such reasons as the Director considers proper. The decision of
the Director regarding such a forfeiture is final.
[5.] 4. The assignment of an offender to the custody of the
Division of Parole and Probation pursuant to this section shall be
deemed:
(a) A continuation of the offender’s imprisonment and not a
release on parole; and
(b) For the purposes of NRS 209.341, an assignment to a facility
of the Department,
 except that the offender is not entitled to obtain any benefits or to
participate in any programs provided to offenders in the custody of
the Department.
-
*AB408*

– 9 –
[6.] 5. The Director may not assign an offender to the custody
of the Division of Parole and Probation pursuant to this section if
the offender is sentenced to death or imprisonment for life without
the possibility of parole.
[7.] 6. An offender does not have a right to be assigned to the
custody of the Division of Parole and Probation pursuant to this
section, or to remain in that custody after such an assignment, and it
is not intended that the provisions of this section or of NRS 213.371
to 213.410, inclusive, create any right or interest in liberty or
property or establish a basis for any cause of action against the
State, its political subdivisions, agencies, boards, commissions,
departments, officers or employees.
[8.] 7. The Division of Parole and Probation may receive and
distribute restitution paid by an offender assigned to the custody of
the Division of Parole and Probation pursuant to this section.
[9.] 8. As used in this section, “crime of violence” means any
offense involving the use or threatened use of force or violence
against another person.
Sec. 6. NRS 209.3925 is hereby amended to read as follows:
209.3925 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [6,]
5, the Director may approve a medical release and assign an
offender to the custody of the Division of Parole and Probation of
the Department of Public Safety to serve a term of residential
confinement pursuant to NRS 213.380 or other appropriate
supervision as determined by the Division of Parole and Probation,
for not longer than the remainder of his or her sentence, if:
(a) The Director has reason to believe that the offender is:
(1) Physically incapacitated or in ill health to such a degree
that the offender does not presently, and likely will not in the future,
pose a threat to the safety of the public; or
(2) In ill health and expected to die within 18 months, and
does not presently, and likely will not in the future, pose a threat to
the safety of the public; and
(b) At least two physicians or nurses licensed pursuant to
chapter 630, 632 or 633 of NRS, as applicable, one of whom is not
employed by the Department, verify, in writing, that the offender is:
(1) Physically incapacitated or in ill health; or
(2) In ill health and expected to die within 18 months.
2. A request for medical release pursuant to this section:
(a) May be submitted to the Director by:
(1) A prison official or employee;
(2) An offender;
(3) An attorney or representative of an offender;
(4) A family member of an offender; or
(5) A medical or mental health professional.
-
*AB408*

– 10 –
(b) Must be in writing and articulate the grounds supporting the
appropriateness of the medical release of the offender.
3. If the Director intends to assign an offender to the custody of
the Division of Parole and Probation pursuant to this section, at least
45 days before the date the offender is expected to be released from
the custody of the Department, the Director shall notify:
(a) The board of county commissioners of the county in which
the offender will reside; and
(b) The Division of Parole and Probation.
4. [Except as otherwise provided in NRS 213.10915, if any
victim of a crime committed by the offender has, pursuant to
subsection 4 of NRS 213.131, requested to be notified of the
consideration of a prisoner for parole and has provided a current
address, the Division of Parole and Probation shall notify the victim
that:
(a) The Director intends to assign the offender to the custody of
the Division of Parole and Probation pursuant to this section; and
(b) The victim may submit documents to the Division of Parole
and Probation regarding such an assignment.
 If a current address has not been provided by a victim as required
by subsection 4 of NRS 213.131, the Division of Parole and
Probation must not be held responsible if notification is not received
by the victim. All personal information, including, but not limited
to, a current or former address, which pertains to a victim and which
is received by the Division of Parole and Probation pursuant to this
subsection is confidential.
5.] If an offender assigned to the custody of the Division of
Parole and Probation pursuant to this section escapes or violates any
of the terms or conditions of his or her residential confinement or
other appropriate supervision as determined by the Division of
Parole and Probation:
(a) The Division of Parole and Probation may, pursuant to the
procedure set forth in NRS 213.410, return the offender to the
custody of the Department.
(b) The offender forfeits all or part of the credits for good
behavior earned by the offender before the escape or violation, as
determined by the Director. The Director may provide for a
forfeiture of credits pursuant to this paragraph only after proof of the
offense and notice to the offender and may restore credits forfeited
for such reasons as the Director considers proper. The decision of
the Director regarding such a forfeiture is final.
[6.] 5. The assignment of an offender to the custody of the
Division of Parole and Probation pursuant to this section shall be
deemed:
-
*AB408*

– 11 –
(a) A continuation of the offender’s imprisonment and not a
release on parole; and
(b) For the purposes of NRS 209.341, an assignment to a facility
of the Department,
 except that the offender is not entitled to obtain any benefits or to
participate in any programs provided to offenders in the custody of
the Department.
[7.] 6. The Director may not assign an offender to the custody
of the Division of Parole and Probation pursuant to this section if
the offender is sentenced to death or imprisonment for life without
the possibility of parole.
[8.] 7. An offender does not have a right to be assigned to the
custody of the Division of Parole and Probation pursuant to this
section, or to remain in that custody after such an assignment, and it
is not intended that the provisions of this section or of NRS 213.371
to 213.410, inclusive, create any right or interest in liberty or
property or establish a basis for any cause of action against the
State, its political subdivisions, agencies, boards, commissions,
departments, officers or employees.
[9.] 8. The Division of Parole and Probation may receive and
distribute restitution paid by an offender assigned to the custody of
the Division of Parole and Probation pursuant to this section.
Sec. 7. NRS 209.429 is hereby amended to read as follows:
209.429 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 7 and
8, the Director may assign an offender to the custody of the Division
of Parole and Probation of the Department of Public Safety to serve
a term of residential confinement, pursuant to NRS 213.380, for not
longer than the remainder of the maximum term or the maximum
aggregate term, as applicable, of his or her sentence if the offender
has:
(a) Demonstrated a willingness and ability to establish a position
of employment in the community;
(b) Demonstrated a willingness and ability to enroll in a
program for education or rehabilitation; or
(c) Demonstrated an ability to pay for all or part of the costs of
his or her confinement and to meet any existing obligation for
restitution to any victim of his or her crime.
2. Before the Director assigns an offender to serve a term of
residential confinement pursuant to this section, the Director shall
notify the Division of Parole and Probation. [Except as otherwise
provided in NRS 213.10915, if any victim of a crime committed by
the offender has, pursuant to:
(a) Subsection 1 of NRS 209.521, requested to be notified by the
Department of Corrections of the offender’s release or escape and
has provided a current address, the Department of Corrections shall
-
*AB408*

– 12 –
notify the victim that the Director intends to consider whether to
assign the offender to serve a term of residential confinement
pursuant to this section and advise the victim that the victim may
submit documents for the consideration of the Director regarding
such an assignment to the Division of Parole and Probation. If a
current address has not been provided as required by subsection 1 of
NRS 209.521, the Department of Corrections must not be held
responsible if such notification is not received by the victim.
(b) Subsection 4 of NRS 213.131, requested to be notified of the
consideration of a prisoner for parole and has provided a current
address, the Division of Parole and Probation shall notify the victim
if the Director has approved the application for the offender to serve
a term of residential confinement pursuant to this section and advise
the victim that the victim may submit documents for the
consideration of the Division of Parole and Probation regarding such
an assignment to the Division of Parole and Probation. If a current
address has not been provided as required by subsection 4 of NRS
213.131, the Division of Parole and Probation must not be held
responsible if such notification is not received by the victim.
 All personal information, including, without limitation, a current
or former address, which pertains to a victim and which is received
by the Department of Corrections or the Division of Parole and
Probation pursuant to this subsection is confidential.]
3. Before a person may be assigned to serve a term of
residential confinement pursuant to this section, [he or she] the
person must submit to the Division of Parole and Probation a signed
document stating that:
(a) [He or she] The person will comply with the terms or
conditions of the residential confinement; and
(b) If [he or she] the person fails to comply with the terms or
conditions of the residential confinement and is taken into custody
outside of this State, [he or she] the person waives all rights relating
to extradition proceedings.
4. If an offender assigned to the custody of the Division of
Parole and Probation pursuant to this section escapes or violates any
of the terms or conditions of his or her residential confinement:
(a) The Division of Parole and Probation may, pursuant to the
procedure set forth in NRS 213.410, return the offender to the
custody of the Department.
(b) The offender forfeits all or part of the credits earned by the
offender to reduce his or her sentence pursuant to this chapter before
the escape or violation, as determined by the Director. The Director
may provide for a forfeiture of credits pursuant to this paragraph
only after proof of the offense and notice to the offender and may
restore credits forfeited for such reasons as the Director considers
-
*AB408*

– 13 –
proper. The decision of the Director regarding forfeiture of credits is
final.
5. The assignment of an offender to the custody of the Division
of Parole and Probation pursuant to this section shall be deemed:
(a) A continuation of the offender’s imprisonment and not a
release on parole; and
(b) For the purposes of NRS 209.341, an assignment to a facility
of the Department,
 except that the offender is not entitled to obtain any benefits or to
participate in any programs provided to offenders in the custody of
the Department.
6. A person does not have a right to be assigned to the custody
of the Division of Parole and Probation pursuant to this section, or
to remain in that custody after such an assignment, and it is not
intended that the provisions of this section or of NRS 213.371 to
213.410, inclusive, create any right or interest in liberty or property
or establish a basis for any cause of action against the State, its
political subdivisions, agencies, boards, commissions, departments,
officers or employees.
7. The Director shall not assign an offender who is serving a
sentence for committing a battery which constitutes domestic
violence pursuant to NRS 33.018 to the custody of the Division of
Parole and Probation to serve a term of residential confinement
unless the Director makes a finding that the offender is not likely to
pose a threat to the victim of the battery.
8. In determining whether to assign an offender to the custody
of the Division of Parole and Probation to serve a term of residential
confinement, the Director may consider whether the offender has
failed or refused to comply with any term or condition of the entire
program of treatment or any term or condition of any other program
related to the classification of the offender.
9. The Division of Parole and Probation may receive and
distribute restitution paid by an offender assigned to the custody of
the Division of Parole and Probation pursuant to this section.
10. As used in this section, “entire program” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 209.427.
Sec. 8. NRS 213.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
213.010 1. The State Board of Pardons Commissioners
consists of the Governor, the justices of the Supreme Court and the
Attorney General.
2. Meetings of the Board for the purpose of considering
applications for clemency may be held semiannually or oftener, on
such dates as may be fixed by the Board.
[3. Except as otherwise provided in a policy adopted pursuant
to NRS 213.035, the Board shall give written notice at least 15 days
-
*AB408*

– 14 –
before a meeting to each victim of the crimes committed by each
person whose application for clemency will be considered at the
meeting, if the victim so requests in writing and provides his or her
current address. If a current address is not provided, the Board may
not be held responsible if the notice is not received by the victim.
The victim may submit a written response to the Board at any time
before the meeting. All personal information, including, but not
limited to, a current or former address, which pertains to a victim
and which is received by the Board pursuant to this subsection is
confidential.]
Sec. 9. NRS 213.035 is hereby amended to read as follows:
213.035 The Board may adopt a policy to provide an expedited
process to take action, without holding a meeting, to restore the civil
rights, in whole or in part, of a person who submits an application to
the Board to have his or her civil rights restored if certain conditions
are met, including, without limitation, that:
1. There is no objection from the court in which the judgment
was rendered;
2. There is no objection from the district attorney of the county
wherein the person was convicted; and
3. [The Board] Any victim of the person has not [received a
written request for] registered with the automated victim
notification system established pursuant to section 2 of this act to
receive notice concerning a meeting to consider an application for
clemency . [from a victim of a crime committed by the person.]
Sec. 10. NRS 213.107 is hereby amended to read as follows:
213.107 As used in NRS 213.107 to 213.157, inclusive, unless
the context otherwise requires:
1. “Automated victim notification system” means the
automated victim notification system established pursuant to
section 2 of this act.
2. “Board” means the State Board of Parole Commissioners.
[2.] 3. “Chief” means the Chief Parole and Probation Officer.
[3.] 4. “Division” means the Division of Parole and Probation
of the Department of Public Safety.
[4.] 5. “Residential confinement” means the confinement of a
person convicted of a crime to his or her place of residence under
the terms and conditions established by the Board.
[5.] 6. “Responsivity factors” means characteristics of a person
that affect his or her ability to respond favorably or unfavorably to
any treatment goals.
[6.] 7. “Risk and needs assessment” means a validated,
standardized actuarial tool that identifies risk factors that increase
the likelihood of a person reoffending and factors that, when
-
*AB408*

– 15 –
properly addressed, can reduce the likelihood of a person
reoffending.
[7.] 8. “Sex offender” means any person who has been or is
convicted of a sexual offense.
[8.] 9. “Sexual offense” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 179D.097.
[9.] 10. “Standards” means the objective standards for
granting or revoking parole or probation which are adopted by the
Board or the Chief.
Sec. 11. NRS 213.1099 is hereby amended to read as follows:
213.1099 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 213.1215, the Board may release on parole a prisoner who is
otherwise eligible for parole pursuant to NRS 213.107 to 213.157,
inclusive.
2. In determining whether to release a prisoner on parole, the
Board shall consider:
(a) Whether there is a reasonable probability that the prisoner
will live and remain at liberty without violating the laws;
(b) Whether the release is incompatible with the welfare of
society;
(c) The seriousness of the offense and the history of criminal
conduct of the prisoner;
(d) The standards adopted pursuant to NRS 213.10885 and the
recommendation, if any, of the Chief; and
(e) Any documents or testimony submitted by a victim notified
[pursuant to NRS 213.131 or 213.10915.] by the automated victim
notification system established pursuant to section 2 of this act.
3. When a person is convicted of a felony and is punished by a
sentence of imprisonment, the person remains subject to the
jurisdiction of the Board from the time the person is released on
parole under the provisions of this chapter until the expiration of the
maximum term or the maximum aggregate term of imprisonment
imposed by the court, as applicable, less any credits earned to
reduce his or her sentence pursuant to chapter 209 of NRS.
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 213.1215, the Board
may not release on parole a prisoner whose sentence to death or to
life without possibility of parole has been commuted to a lesser
penalty unless the Board finds that the prisoner has served at least
20 consecutive years in the state prison, is not under an order to be
detained to answer for a crime or violation of parole or probation in
another jurisdiction, and does not have a history of:
(a) Recent misconduct in the institution, and has been
recommended for parole by the Director of the Department of
Corrections;
(b) Repetitive criminal conduct;
-
*AB408*

– 16 –
(c) Criminal conduct related to the use of alcohol or drugs;
(d) Repetitive sexual deviance, violence or aggression; or
(e) Failure in parole, probation, work release or similar
programs.
5. In determining whether to release a prisoner on parole
pursuant to this section, the Board shall not consider whether the
prisoner will soon be eligible for release pursuant to NRS 213.1215.
6. The Board shall not release on parole an offender convicted
of a sexual offense until the Central Repository for Nevada Records
of Criminal History has been provided an opportunity to give the
notice required pursuant to NRS 179D.475.
Sec. 12. NRS 213.1215 is hereby amended to read as follows:
213.1215 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
in cases where a consecutive sentence is still to be served, if a
prisoner sentenced to imprisonment for a term of 3 years or more:
(a) Has not been released on parole previously for that sentence;
and
(b) Is not otherwise ineligible for parole,
 the prisoner must be released on parole 12 months before the end
of his or her maximum term or maximum aggregate term, as
applicable, as reduced by any credits the prisoner has earned to
reduce his or her sentence pursuant to chapter 209 of NRS.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a prisoner who
was sentenced to life imprisonment with the possibility of parole
and who was less than 16 years of age at the time that the prisoner
committed the offense for which the prisoner was imprisoned must,
if the prisoner still has a consecutive sentence to be served, be
granted parole from his or her current term of imprisonment to his
or her subsequent term of imprisonment or must, if the prisoner does
not still have a consecutive sentence to be served, be released on
parole, if:
(a) The prisoner has served the minimum term or the minimum
aggregate term of imprisonment imposed by the court, as applicable;
(b) The prisoner has completed a program of general education
or an industrial or vocational training program;
(c) The prisoner has not been identified as a member of a group
that poses a security threat pursuant to the procedures for identifying
security threats established by the Department of Corrections; and
(d) The prisoner has not, within the immediately preceding 24
months:
(1) Committed a major violation of the regulations of the
Department of Corrections; or
(2) Been housed in disciplinary segregation.
3. If a prisoner who meets the criteria set forth in subsection 2
is determined to be a high risk to reoffend in a sexual manner
-
*AB408*

– 17 –
pursuant to NRS 213.1214, the Board is not required to release the
prisoner on parole pursuant to this section. If the prisoner is not
granted parole, a rehearing date must be scheduled pursuant to
NRS 213.142.
4. The Board shall prescribe any conditions necessary for the
orderly conduct of the parolee upon his or her release.
5. Each parolee so released must be supervised closely by the
Division, in accordance with the plan for enhanced supervision
developed by the Chief pursuant to NRS 213.122.
6. If a prisoner meets the criteria set forth in subsection 1 and
[there are no current requests for notification of hearings made in
accordance with subsection 4 of NRS 213.131 or, if the Board is not
required to provide notification of hearings pursuant to NRS
213.10915, the Board] a victim has not [been] requested to be
notified by the automated victim notification system [that a victim
of the prisoner has registered with the system to receive notification
of hearings,] established pursuant to section 2 of this act
concerning the date on which the Board will consider a prisoner
for parole, the Board may grant parole to the prisoner without a
meeting. If the Board finds that there is a reasonable probability that
a prisoner considered for release on parole pursuant to subsection 1
will be a danger to public safety while on parole, the Board may
require the prisoner to serve the balance of his or her sentence and
not grant the parole. If, pursuant to this subsection, the Board does
not grant the parole provided for in subsection 1, the Board shall
provide to the prisoner a written statement of its reasons for denying
parole.
7. If the Board finds that there is a reasonable probability that a
prisoner considered for release on parole pursuant to subsection 2
will be a danger to public safety while on parole, the Board is not
required to grant the parole and shall schedule a rehearing pursuant
to NRS 213.142. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of
NRS 213.1519, if a prisoner is not granted parole pursuant to this
subsection, the criteria set forth in subsection 2 must be applied at
each subsequent hearing until the prisoner is granted parole or
expires his or her sentence. If, pursuant to this subsection, the Board
does not grant the parole provided for in subsection 2, the Board
shall provide to the prisoner a written statement of its reasons for
denying parole, along with specific recommendations of the Board,
if any, to improve the possibility of granting parole the next time the
prisoner may be considered for parole.
8. If the prisoner is the subject of a lawful request from another
law enforcement agency that the prisoner be held or detained for
release to that agency, the prisoner must not be released on parole,
but released to that agency.
-
*AB408*

– 18 –
9. If the Division has not completed its establishment of a
program for the prisoner’s activities during his or her parole
pursuant to this section, the prisoner must be released on parole as
soon as practicable after the prisoner’s program is established.
10. For the purposes of this section, the determination of the
12-month period before the end of a prisoner’s term must be
calculated without consideration of any credits the prisoner may
have earned to reduce his or her sentence had the prisoner not been
paroled.
Sec. 13. NRS 213.12155 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
213.12155 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
Board may grant geriatric parole to a prisoner if [he or she:] the
prisoner:
(a) Has not been convicted of:
(1) A crime of violence;
(2) A crime against a child as defined in NRS 179D.0357;
(3) A sexual offense;
(4) Vehicular homicide pursuant to NRS 484C.130; or
(5) A violation of NRS 484C.430;
(b) Has not been found to be a habitual criminal pursuant to
NRS 207.010;
(c) Is not serving a sentence of life imprisonment without the
possibility of parole and has not been sentenced to death;
(d) Does not pose a significant and articulable risk to public
safety; and
(e) Is 65 years of age or older and has served at least a majority
of the maximum term or maximum aggregate term, as applicable, of
his or her sentence.
2. Consideration for geriatric parole may be initiated by the
submission of a written application and supporting documentation to
the Board, including, without limitation, relevant medical records,
plans for parole, program participation records, institutional records,
documents concerning eligibility for Medicaid or Medicare and any
other relevant documents, from:
(a) A prison official or employee;
(b) A prisoner;
(c) An attorney or representative of a prisoner;
(d) A family member of a prisoner; or
(e) A medical or mental health professional.
3. Not later than 15 days after receipt of an application
submitted pursuant to subsection 2, the Board shall notify the
Department of the application and request verification of the
prisoner’s age and the length of time the prisoner has spent in
the custody of the Department.
-
*AB408*

– 19 –
4. Upon receipt of a request from the Board submitted pursuant
to subsection 3, if the Department determines that the prisoner:
(a) Meets the criteria set forth in subsection 1, the Department
shall:
(1) Notify the Board of the prisoner’s eligibility for
consideration of geriatric parole;
(2) Place the prisoner on the next available list of persons
eligible for parole pursuant to NRS 209.254; and
(3) Provide to the Board a report prepared in accordance with
paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 213.131.
(b) Does not meet the criteria set forth in subsection 1, the
Department shall notify the Board and explain the reasons for such a
determination.
5. Upon receipt of the list prepared pursuant to NRS 209.254,
the Board shall, after sending copies of the list to all law
enforcement agencies in this State and other appropriate persons in
accordance with subsection 5 of NRS 213.1085, schedule a hearing
to consider the geriatric parole of an eligible prisoner whose name
appears on the list.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, the Board
shall schedule and conduct the geriatric parole hearing of a prisoner
in the same general manner in which other prisoners are considered
for parole. The Board shall notify the prisoner and the person
submitting the application pursuant to subsection 2 of the date, time
and location of the geriatric parole hearing.
7. When determining whether to grant geriatric parole to a
prisoner, the Board must consider:
(a) The prisoner’s:
(1) Age;
(2) Behavior while in custody; and
(3) Potential for violence;
(b) The reported severity of any illness, disease or infirmity of
the prisoner; and
(c) Any available alternatives for maintaining geriatric inmates
or inmates who have a medical condition in traditional settings.
8. The Board shall notify a prisoner of the Board’s decision as
to whether to grant geriatric parole in accordance with subsection
[11] 9 of NRS 213.131.
9. At the time of the release of a prisoner on geriatric parole,
the Board shall prescribe the terms and conditions of the geriatric
parole.
10. A person who is granted geriatric parole pursuant to this
section is under the supervision of the Division. The Division is
responsible for supervising the person’s compliance with the terms
and conditions prescribed by the Board.
-
*AB408*

– 20 –
11. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the Board
shall not take any action on an application submitted pursuant to
subsection 2 if the prisoner to whom the application pertains was
previously denied geriatric parole and less than 24 months have
elapsed since the most recent denial. The Board may take action on
such an application if a shorter period has been prescribed by the
Board or a request is made by the Director of the Department
because of the adverse health of the prisoner.
12. The provisions of this section are not intended to replace
the provisions relating to the general eligibility and consideration of
parole provided in NRS 213.1099 and 213.1215.
13. The Board shall adopt any regulations necessary to carry
out the provisions of this section.
14. As used in this section, “Department” means the
Department of Corrections.
Sec. 14. NRS 213.131 is hereby amended to read as follows:
213.131 1. The Department of Corrections shall:
(a) Determine when a prisoner sentenced to imprisonment in the
state prison is eligible to be considered for parole;
(b) Notify the Board of the eligibility of the prisoner to be
considered for parole; and
(c) Before a meeting to consider the prisoner for parole, compile
and provide to the Board data that will assist the Board in
determining whether parole should be granted.
2. If a prisoner is being considered for parole from a sentence
imposed for conviction of a crime which involved the use of force
or violence against a victim and which resulted in bodily harm to a
victim and if original or duplicate photographs that depict the
injuries of the victim or the scene of the crime were admitted at the
trial of the prisoner or were part of the report of the presentence
investigation and are reasonably available, a representative sample
of such photographs must be included with the information
submitted to the Board at the meeting. A prisoner may not bring a
cause of action against the State of Nevada, its political
subdivisions, agencies, boards, commissions, departments, officers
or employees for any action that is taken pursuant to this subsection
or for failing to take any action pursuant to this subsection,
including, without limitation, failing to include photographs or
including only certain photographs. As used in this subsection,
“photograph” includes any video, digital or other photographic
image.
3. Meetings to consider prisoners for parole may be held
semiannually or more often, on such dates as may be fixed by the
Board. All meetings are quasi-judicial and must be open to the
public. No rights other than those conferred pursuant to this section
-
*AB408*

– 21 –
or pursuant to specific statute concerning meetings to consider
prisoners for parole are available to any person with respect to such
meetings.
4. [Except as otherwise provided in NRS 213.10915, not later
than 5 days after the date on which the Board fixes the date of the
meeting to consider a prisoner for parole, the Board shall notify the
victim of the prisoner who is being considered for parole of the date
of the meeting and of the victim’s rights pursuant to this subsection,
if the victim has requested notification in writing and has provided
his or her current address or if the victim’s current address is
otherwise known by the Board. The victim of a prisoner being
considered for parole may submit documents to the Board and may
testify at the meeting held to consider the prisoner for parole.] A
prisoner must not be considered for parole until the [Board]
automated victim notification system established pursuant to
section 2 of this act has notified any victim of his or her rights
pursuant to this subsection and the victim is given the opportunity to
exercise those rights. [If a current address is not provided to or
otherwise known by the Board, the Board must not be held
responsible if such notification is not received by the victim.]
5. The Board may deliberate in private after a public meeting
held to consider a prisoner for parole.
6. The Board of State Prison Commissioners shall provide
suitable and convenient rooms or space for use of the State Board of
Parole Commissioners.
7. [Except as otherwise provided in NRS 213.10915, if a
victim is notified of a meeting to consider a prisoner for parole
pursuant to subsection 4, the Board shall, upon making a final
decision concerning the parole of the prisoner, notify the victim of
its final decision.
8. All personal information, including, but not limited to, a
current or former address, which pertains to a victim and which is
received by the Board pursuant to this section is confidential.
9.] The Board may grant parole without a meeting, pursuant to
NRS 213.1215 or 213.133, but the Board must not deny parole to a
prisoner unless the prisoner has been given reasonable notice of the
meeting and the opportunity to be present at the meeting. If the
Board fails to provide notice of the meeting to the prisoner or to
provide the prisoner with an opportunity to be present and
determines that it may deny parole, the Board may reschedule the
meeting.
[10.] 8. During a meeting to consider a prisoner for parole, the
Board shall allow the prisoner:
(a) At his or her own expense, to have a representative present
with whom the prisoner may confer; and
-
*AB408*

– 22 –
(b) To speak on his or her own behalf or to have his or her
representative speak on his or her behalf.
[11.] 9. Upon making a final decision concerning the parole of
the prisoner, the Board shall provide written notice to the prisoner of
its decision not later than 10 working days after the meeting and, if
parole is denied, specific recommendations of the Board to improve
the possibility of granting parole the next time the prisoner is
considered for parole, if any.
[12.] 10. For the purposes of this section, “victim” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 213.005.
Sec. 15. NRS 213.133 is hereby amended to read as follows:
213.133 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 6, 7
and 8, the Board may delegate its authority to hear, consider and act
upon the parole of a prisoner and on any issue before the Board to a
panel consisting of:
(a) Two or more members of the Board, two of whom constitute
a quorum; or
(b) One member of the Board who is assisted by a case hearing
representative.
2. No action taken by any panel created pursuant to paragraph
(a) of subsection 1 is valid unless concurred in by a majority vote of
those sitting on the panel.
3. The decision of a panel is subject to final approval by the
affirmative action of a majority of the members appointed to the
Board. Such action may be taken at a meeting of the Board or
without a meeting by the delivery of written approval to the
Executive Secretary of the Board.
4. The degree of complexity of issues presented must be taken
into account before the Board makes any delegation of its authority
and before it determines the extent of a delegation.
5. The Board shall adopt regulations which establish the basic
types of delegable cases and the size of the panel required for each
type of case.
6. A hearing concerning the parole of a prisoner or any
decision on an issue involving a person:
(a) Who committed a capital offense;
(b) Who is serving a sentence of imprisonment for life;
(c) Who has been convicted of a sexual offense involving the
use or threat of use of force or violence;
(d) Who is a habitual criminal; or
(e) Whose sentence has been commuted by the State Board of
Pardons Commissioners,
 must be conducted by at least three members of the Board, and
action may be taken only with the concurrence of at least four
members.
-
*AB408*

– 23 –
7. If a recommendation made by a panel deviates from the
standards adopted by the Board pursuant to NRS 213.10885 or
the recommendation of the Division, the Chair must concur in the
recommendation.
8. In accordance with any regulations adopted by the Board, a
member of the Board or a person who has been designated as a case
hearing representative in accordance with NRS 213.135 shall review
the parole eligibility of a prisoner and recommend to the Board that
a prisoner be released on parole without a meeting if:
(a) The prisoner is not serving a sentence for a crime described
in subsection 6;
(b) The parole standards created pursuant to NRS 213.10885
suggest that parole should be granted;
(c) [There are no current requests for notification of hearings
made in accordance with subsection 4 of NRS 213.131 or, if the
Board is not required to provide notification of hearings pursuant to
NRS 213.10915, the Board] A victim has not [been] requested to be
notified by the automated victim notification system [that a victim
of the prisoner has registered with the system to receive notification
of hearings;] concerning the date on which the Board will consider
the prisoner for parole; and
(d) Notice to law enforcement of the eligibility for parole of the
prisoner was given pursuant to subsection 5 of NRS 213.1085, and
no person objected to granting parole without a meeting during the
30-day notice period.
9. If a member of the Board or a person who has been
designated as a case hearing representative in accordance with NRS
213.135 does not recommend that a prisoner be released on parole
without a meeting pursuant to subsection 8, the prisoner must have a
parole hearing.
10. A recommendation made in accordance with subsection 8
is subject to final approval by the affirmative action of a majority of
the members appointed to the Board. The final approval by
affirmative action must not take place until the expiration of the 30-
day notice period to law enforcement of the eligibility for parole of
the prisoner in accordance with subsection 5 of NRS 213.1085.
Such action may be taken at a meeting of the Board or without a
meeting of the Board by delivery of written approval to the
Executive Secretary of the Board by a majority of the members.
Sec. 16. NRS 178.5698 is hereby amended to read as follows:
178.5698 1. The prosecuting attorney, sheriff or chief of
police shall, upon the request of a victim or witness, inform the
victim or witness:
(a) When the defendant is released from custody at any time
before or during the trial, including, without limitation, when the
-
*AB408*

– 24 –
defendant is released pending trial or subject to electronic
supervision;
(b) If the defendant is so released, the amount of bail required, if
any; and
(c) Of the final disposition of the criminal case in which the
victim or witness was directly involved.
2. A request for information pursuant to subsection 1 must be
made:
(a) In writing; or
(b) By telephone through an automated or computerized system
of notification, if such a system is available.
3. If an offender is convicted of a sexual offense or an offense
involving the use or threatened use of force or violence against the
victim, the court shall provide:
(a) To each witness, documentation that includes:
(1) A form advising the witness of the right to be notified
pursuant to subsection 5;
(2) The form that the witness must use to request notification
in writing; and
(3) The form or procedure that the witness must use to
provide a change of address after a request for notification has been
submitted.
(b) To each person listed in subsection 4, documentation that
includes:
(1) A form advising the person of the right to be notified
pursuant to subsection 5 or 6 and NRS 176.015, 176A.630,
178.4715, [209.392, 209.3923, 209.3925, 209.429, 209.521,
213.010,] 213.040 [,] and 213.095 [and 213.131 or NRS
213.10915;] , and section 2 of this act;
(2) The forms that the person must use to request
notification; and
(3) The forms or procedures that the person must use to
provide a change of address after a request for notification has been
submitted.
4. The following persons are entitled to receive documentation
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 3:
(a) A person against whom the offense is committed.
(b) A person who is injured as a direct result of the commission
of the offense.
(c) If a person listed in paragraph (a) or (b) is under the age of
18 years, each parent or guardian who is not the offender.
(d) Each surviving spouse, parent and child of a person who is
killed as a direct result of the commission of the offense.
-
*AB408*

– 25 –
(e) A relative of a person listed in paragraphs (a) to (d),
inclusive, if the relative requests in writing to be provided with the
documentation.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, if the offense
was a felony and the offender is imprisoned, the warden of the
prison shall, if the victim or witness so requests in writing and
provides a current address, notify the victim or witness at that
address when the offender is released from the prison.
6. If the offender was convicted of a violation of subsection 3
of NRS 200.366 or a violation of subsection 1, paragraph (a) of
subsection 2 or subparagraph (2) of paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of
NRS 200.508, the warden of the prison shall notify:
(a) The immediate family of the victim if the immediate family
provides their current address;
(b) Any member of the victim’s family related within the third
degree of consanguinity, if the member of the victim’s family so
requests in writing and provides a current address; and
(c) The victim, if the victim will be 18 years of age or older at
the time of the release and has provided a current address,
 before the offender is released from prison.
7. The warden must not be held responsible for any injury
proximately caused by the failure to give any notice required
pursuant to this section if no address was provided to the warden or
if the address provided is inaccurate or not current.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Immediate family” means any adult relative of the victim
living in the victim’s household.
(b) “Sexual offense” means:
(1) Sexual assault pursuant to NRS 200.366;
(2) Statutory sexual seduction pursuant to NRS 200.368;
(3) Battery with intent to commit sexual assault pursuant to
NRS 200.400;
(4) An offense involving pornography and a minor pursuant
to NRS 200.710 to 200.730, inclusive;
(5) Fertility fraud pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1
of NRS 200.975;
(6) Incest pursuant to NRS 201.180;
(7) Open or gross lewdness pursuant to NRS 201.210;
(8) Indecent or obscene exposure pursuant to NRS 201.220;
(9) Lewdness with a child pursuant to NRS 201.230;
(10) Sexual penetration of a dead human body pursuant to
NRS 201.450;
(11) Sexual conduct between certain employees of a school
or volunteers at a school and a pupil pursuant to NRS 201.540;
-
*AB408*

– 26 –
(12) Sexual conduct between certain employees of a college
or university and a student pursuant to NRS 201.550;
(13) Luring a child or a person with mental illness pursuant
to NRS 201.560, if punished as a felony;
(14) An offense that, pursuant to a specific statute, is
determined to be sexually motivated; or
(15) An attempt to commit an offense listed in this
paragraph.
Sec. 17. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, [209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925,] 209.419, [209.429, 209.521,] 211A.140, [213.010,]
213.040, 213.095, [213.131,] 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475,
218A.350, 218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350,
218G.615, 224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495,
228.570, 231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
-
*AB408*

– 27 –
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
-
*AB408*

– 28 –
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and section 2 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter
478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes
of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
-
*AB408*

– 29 –
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 18. NRS 209.521, 213.10915 and 228.205 are hereby
repealed.
Sec. 19. This act becomes effective on January 1, 2026.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTIONS
209.521 Notification of victim of escape or release of
offender.
1. If a victim of an offender provides his or her current address
to the Director and makes a written request for notification of the
offender’s release or escape, the Director shall notify the victim if
the offender:
(a) Will be released into the community for the purpose of
employment, training or education, or for any other purpose for
which release is authorized; or
(b) Has escaped from the custody of the Department.
2. An offender must not be temporarily released into the
community for any purpose unless notification of the release has
been given to every victim of the offender who has requested
notification and has provided his or her current address.
3. The Director may not be held responsible for any injury
proximately caused by the Director’s failure to give any notice
required pursuant to subsection 1 or 2 if no address was provided to
the Director or the address provided is inaccurate or not current.
4. All personal information, including, but not limited to, a
current or former address, which pertains to a victim and which is
received by the Director pursuant to this section is confidential.
5. As used in this section, “victim” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 213.005.
-
*AB408*

– 30 –
213.10915 Automated victim notification of eligibility of
prisoner for residential confinement and consideration for
parole; requirements; exceptions.
1. The Board, in consultation with the Division, may enter into
an agreement with the manager of an automated victim notification
system to notify victims of the information described in NRS
209.392, 209.3923, 209.3925 and 209.429 and subsections 4 and 7
of NRS 213.131 through the system if the system is capable of:
(a) Automatically notifying by telephone or electronic means a
victim registered with the system of the information described in
NRS 209.392, 209.3923, 209.3925 and 209.429 and subsections 4
and 7 of NRS 213.131 with the timeliness required by NRS
209.392, 209.3923, 209.3925 and 209.429 and subsections 4 and 7
of NRS 213.131; and
(b) Notifying victims registered with the system, using language
provided by the Board, if the Board decides that it will discontinue
the use of the system to notify victims of the information described
in NRS 209.392, 209.3923, 209.3925 and 209.429 and subsections 4
and 7 of NRS 213.131. The notice must:
(1) Be provided to each victim registered with the system not
less than 90 days before the date on which the Board will
discontinue use of the system; and
(2) Advise each victim to submit a written request for
notification pursuant to subsection 4 of NRS 213.131 if the victim
wishes to receive notice of the information described in NRS
209.392, 209.3923, 209.3925 and 209.429 and subsections 4 and 7
of NRS 213.131.
2. The Division is not required to notify the victim of an
offender of the information described in NRS 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925 and 209.429, and the Board is not required to notify the
victim of a prisoner of the information described in subsections 4
and 7 of NRS 213.131 if:
(a) The Board has entered into an agreement pursuant to
subsection 1; and
(b) Before discontinuing the notification of victims pursuant to
NRS 209.392, 209.3923, 209.3925 and 209.429 and subsections 4
and 7 of NRS 213.131, the Board, not less than two times and not
less than 60 days apart, has notified each victim who has requested
notification pursuant to subsection 4 of NRS 213.131 and who has
provided his or her current address or whose current address is
otherwise known by the Board of the change in the manner in which
a victim is notified of the information described in NRS 209.392,
209.3923, 209.3925 and 209.429 and subsections 4 and 7 of NRS
213.131. The notice must:
-
*AB408*

– 31 –
(1) Advise the victim that the Division will no longer notify
the victim of the information described in NRS 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925 and 209.429, that the Board will no longer notify the
victim of the information described in subsections 4 and 7 of NRS
213.131, and that the victim may register with the automated victim
notification system if he or she wishes to be notified of the
information described in NRS 209.392, 209.3923, 209.3925 and
209.429 and subsections 4 and 7 of NRS 213.131; and
(2) Include instructions for registering with the automated
victim notification system to receive notice of the information
described in NRS 209.392, 209.3923, 209.3925 and 209.429 and
subsections 4 and 7 of NRS 213.131.
3. For the purposes of this section, “victim” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 213.005.
228.205 Victim Information Notification Everyday System:
Creation; Governance Committee; gifts, grants and donations;
cooperation of certain state and local agencies; no cause of
action by victim of crime established by failure of System.
1. There is hereby created in the Office of the Attorney General
the Victim Information Notification Everyday System, which
consists of a toll-free telephone number and an Internet website
through which victims of crime and members of the public may
register to receive automated information and notification
concerning changes in the custody status of an offender.
2. The Committee on Domestic Violence appointed pursuant to
NRS 228.470 shall serve as the Governance Committee for the
System.
3. The Governance Committee may adopt policies, protocols
and regulations for the operation and oversight of the System.
4. The Attorney General may apply for and accept gifts, grants
and donations for use in carrying out the provisions of this section.
5. To the extent of available funding, each sheriff and chief of
police, the Department of Corrections, the Department of Public
Safety and the State Board of Parole Commissioners shall cooperate
with the Attorney General to establish and maintain the System.
6. The failure of the System to notify a victim of a crime of a
change in the custody status of an offender does not establish a basis
for any cause of action by the victim or any other party against the
State, its political subdivisions, or the agencies, boards,
commissions, departments, officers or employees of the State or its
political subdivisions.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Custody status” means the transfer of the custody of an
offender or the release or escape from custody of an offender.
-
*AB408*

– 32 –
(b) “Offender” means a person convicted of a crime and
sentenced to imprisonment in a county jail or in the state prison.
H
-
*AB408*